New Jersey, session 222, S4665.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The following language provision is added to section 1 of P.L.2026, c.27, the annual appropriations act for fiscal year 2027, as follows: 74 DEPARTMENT OF STATE 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 74 General Government Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES From the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Office of Volunteerism, $50,000 shall be transferred to the Department of Human Services and $50,000 shall be transferred to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development for the purposes of effectuating the provisions of P.L.2026, c.87, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.